test/src/morphology/V-sueuemae77_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `süümä: # Verb (77) `süümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `süümä+V+Inf/mA: `süümä
     `süümä+V+Inf: süvväq
     `süümä+V+ActPrtPrc: söönüq
     `süümä+V+PssPrtPrc: süüd
     `süümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: süü
     `süümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: [süü, sööse]
     `süümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `sei(e)
     `süümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: `sei(e)
